Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 9 Grains and Bread

Cross references.

Regulation of business of grain dealers, §

2-9-30

et seq.

26-2-290.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Bread” means the foods commonly known and described as white bread and rolls, including, but not restricted to, Vienna bread, French bread, and Italian bread and rolls of the semibread dough type, such as soft rolls, hamburger, hot dog, parker house, etc., hard rolls, such as Vienna, Kaiser, etc., all made without fillings or icings, but shall not include sweet, yeast-raised rolls or sweet buns, cinnamon rolls or buns, butterfly rolls, etc.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Degerminated corn meal” means all ground corn, corn meal, and bolted corn meal intended for human consumption which has undergone a refining process with a resultant loss of more than 10 percent of the germ.

“Degerminated hominy grits” means all corn grits, grits, pearled grits, and endosperm portions of corn intended for human consumption which has undergone a refining process with a resultant loss of more than 10 percent of the germs.

“Enrichment” as applied to flour, bread, meal, or grits means the addition thereto of vitamins and other ingredients of the nature required by this article; and the terms “enriched flour,” “enriched bread,” “enriched degerminated corn meal,” and “enriched degerminated hominy grits” mean bread, flour, corn meal, or grits, as the case may be, which has been enriched to conform to the requirements of this article.

“Flour” means flour of every kind and description made wholly or partly from wheat which conforms to the definition and standard of identity of flour, white flour, wheat flour, phosphated flour, self-rising flour, bromated flour, and plain flour as promulgated in the rules and regulations made by the Commissioner, but excludes whole-wheat flour made only from the whole-wheat berry with no part thereof removed, and also excludes special packaged flours not used for bread baking, such as cake, pancake, cracker, and pastry flours.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, or any unincorporated organization.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 1.

Cross references.

Grits as official prepared food, §

50-3-78

.

26-2-291.
Vitamins and ingredients in flour; specification changes; milling process.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, mix, compound, sell, or offer for sale, for human consumption in this state, any flour unless the following vitamins and other ingredients are contained in each pound of such flour:

Not less than 2.0 milligrams of vitamin B1 (thiamin);

Not less than 1.2 milligrams of riboflavin;

Not less than 16 milligrams of niacin (nicotinic acid) or niacin amide (nicotinic acid amide); and

Not less than 13 milligrams of iron.

The enrichment of self-rising flour shall require, in addition to the ingredients required in subsection (a) of this Code section, not less than 500 milligrams of calcium.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to change, or add to, in his discretion, the specifications for ingredients and the amounts thereof, in order that they shall conform to the federal definition of enriched flour when promulgated or as may from time to time be amended.

If other vitamins and minerals are added to flour, they shall be added only in accordance with the regulations of the Commissioner.

Iron shall be added only in forms which are assimilable and harmless and which do not impair the enriched flour.

The enrichment of flour shall be accomplished by a milling process, addition of vitamins from a natural or synthetic source, addition of minerals, or by a combination of these methods, or by any method which is permitted by the Commissioner with respect to flour.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 2.

26-2-292.
Vitamins and ingredients in bread; specification changes.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, bake, sell or offer for sale or to receive an interstate shipment for sale for human consumption in this state any bread unless the following vitamins and other ingredients are contained in each pound of such bread:

Not less than 1.1 milligrams of vitamin B1 (thiamin);

Not less than 0.7 milligrams of riboflavin;

Not less than 10.0 milligrams of niacin (nicotinic acid) or niacin amide (nicotinic acid amide); and

Not less than 10 milligrams of iron.

The enrichment of bread may be accomplished through the use of enriched flour, special yeast, and other enriching ingredients, synthetic vitamins, harmless iron salts, or by any combination of harmless methods which will produce bread enriched so as to meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Iron shall be added only in forms which are assimilable and harmless and which do not impair the enriched bread.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to change, or add to, in his discretion, the specifications for ingredients and the amounts thereof in order that they shall conform to the federal definition of enriched bread when promulgated or as may from time to time be amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 3.

26-2-293.
Vitamins and ingredients in degerminated corn meal and degerminated hominy grits; specification changes; milling process.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, mix, compound, sell, or offer for sale, for human consumption in this state, any degerminated corn meal or degerminated hominy grits unless the following vitamins and other ingredients are contained in each pound of such products:

Not less than 2.0 milligrams of vitamin B1 (thiamin);

Not less than 1.2 milligrams of riboflavin;

Not less than 16 milligrams of niacin (nicotinic acid) or niacin amide (nicotinic acid amide); and

Not less than 13 milligrams of iron.

Iron shall be added only in forms which are assimilable and harmless and which do not harm the enriched corn meal or enriched grits.

The substances referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section may be added in a harmless carrier which does not impair the enriched degerminated corn meal or enriched degerminated hominy grits, provided that such carrier is used only in the quantity necessary to effect an intimate and uniform admixture of such substances with the grits or corn meal.

If other vitamins and minerals are added to degerminated corn meal or degerminated hominy grits, they shall be added only in accordance with such pertinent regulations as may be promulgated by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to change, or add to, in his discretion, the specifications for ingredients and the amounts thereof in order that they shall conform to the federal definition of enriched degerminated corn meal or enriched degerminated grits when promulgated or as from time to time may be amended.

The enrichment of degerminated corn meal or degerminated hominy grits may be accomplished by a milling process, addition of vitamins from a natural or synthetic source, other enriching ingredients, harmless and assimilable inorganic salts, or by a combination of these methods which will produce enriched grits or enriched corn meal as herein defined.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 4.

26-2-294.
Exemptions.

The terms of this article shall not apply to:

Flour, corn meal, or grits sold to bakers or other commercial secondary processors if, prior to or simultaneously with delivery, the purchaser furnishes to the seller a certificate of intent in such form as the Commissioner shall by regulation prescribe, certifying that such flour, corn meal, or grits shall be used only in the production of flour, bread, corn meal, or grits enriched within the given establishment to meet the requirements of this article or shall be used in the manufacture of products other than those covered by this article. It shall be unlawful for any such purchaser so furnishing any such certificate of intent to use the unenriched flour, corn meal, or grits so purchased in any manner other than as stated in the certificate;

Flour or bread which is made from the entire wheat berry with no parts of the wheat removed from the mixture. In cases of flour or bread containing mixtures of the whole wheat berry and white flour or mixture of various portions of the wheat berry, such products shall have a vitamin and mineral potency at least equal to enriched flour or enriched bread as described herein;

Corn meal or grits which is made from the entire corn with no parts of the corn removed from the mixture, but shall not be construed to prevent the enrichment of such products if so desired by the manufacturer. Any products so enriched must conform to standards and labeling provisions as provided in this article as modified by the Commissioner;

Flour, corn meal, or grits for the wheat and corn producer whereby the miller is paid in wheat or corn or feed for the grinding service rendered, except in so far as such a mill may produce flour or degerminated corn meal or grits and sell or offer for sale such products, whereupon this article shall be applicable; nor shall this article apply to farmers in exchanging their corn for corn meal and wheat for flour, or having the same ground into flour, corn meal, or grits and disposing of the same for their own use or the use of the farm labor on their farms; or

Mills doing custom grinding of wheat, whose capacity is 20 bushels of wheat per hour or less, and for custom mills that do not use artificial methods for bleaching flour.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 5.

26-2-295.
Labeling requirements.

It shall be unlawful to sell or offer for sale in this state any enriched flour, enriched bread, enriched degerminated corn meal, or enriched degerminated hominy grits which, if wrapped, fails to conform to the labeling requirements of the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 6.

26-2-296.
Duties of Commissioner of Agriculture.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized as the administrative agency and is directed:

To make, amend, and rescind such rules and regulations, in his discretion, as may be necessary to carry out this article, including, but without being limited to, such orders, rules, and regulations as he is hereinafter specifically authorized and directed to make; and

From time to time to adopt, in his discretion, such regulations changing or adding to the required ingredients for flour, bread, corn meal, or grits, specified in Code Sections 26-2-291 through 26-2-293, as shall be necessary to conform to the definitions and standards of identity of enriched flour, enriched bread, enriched degerminated corn meal, and enriched degerminated hominy grits, from time to time promulgated by the rules and regulations made by the Commissioner.

All orders, rules, and regulations adopted by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to this article shall be published as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, and, within the limits specified by this article, shall become effective upon such date as the Commissioner shall fix.

Whenever under this article publication of any notice, order, rule, or regulation is required, such publication shall be made at least three times in ten days in newspapers of general circulation in three different sections of the state.

The Commissioner is authorized to collect samples for analysis and to conduct examinations and investigations for the purposes of this article through any officers or employees under his supervision; and all such officers and employees shall have authority to enter to inspect any factory, mill, warehouse, shop, or establishment where flour, bread, corn meal, or grits is manufactured, processed, packed, sold, or held, or to inspect any vehicle and any flour, bread, corn meal, or grits therein, and all pertinent equipment, materials, containers, and labeling.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 7; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “; and” for a concluding period at the end of paragraph (a)(1).

26-2-297.
Penalty.

Any person who violates this article or the orders, rules, or regulations promulgated by the Department of Agriculture under authority of this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be subject to a fine for each and every offense in a sum not exceeding $100.00 or to imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 425, § 8.